Utah statutes.
26-2-14.2.   Delayed registration of birth resulting in stillbirth.

When a birth resulting in stillbirth occurring in this state has not been registered within one year after the date of delivery, a certificate marked "delayed" may be filed and registered in accordance with department rule relating to evidentiary and other requirements sufficient to substantiate the alleged facts of birth resulting in stillbirth.

